Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2675.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The following acts or parts of acts are each repealed:(1) RCW 43.63A.315 (Independent youth housing account) and 2007 c 316 s 7;(2) RCW 43.70.323 (Hospital infection control grant account) and 2007 c 261 s 5;(3) RCW 43.79.545 (Climate resiliency account) and 2020 c 357 s 924;(4) RCW 43.101.430 (Criminal justice training commission firing range maintenance account) and 2013 c 265 s 1;(5) RCW 50.16.100 (COVID-19 unemployment account) and 2020 c 7 s 4;(6) RCW 72.72.030 (Institutional impact accountâReimbursement to political subdivisionsâLimitations) and 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 714, 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 10, 1985 c 57 s 71, 1983 c 279 s 2, & 1979 ex.s. c 108 s 3;(7) RCW 77.55.331 (Hydraulic project approval account) and 2012 1st sp.s. c 1 s 104; and(8) 2021 c 292 s 2.Sec. 2. RCW 46.68.175 and 2025 c 417 s 110 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The abandoned recreational vehicle disposal account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from the fee imposed in RCW 46.17.380 must be deposited into the account. The account may receive fund transfers and appropriations from the general fund, as well as gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of chapter 287, Laws of 2018 and expend any income according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments, provided that those terms do not conflict with any provisions of this section or any guidelines developed to prioritize reimbursement of removal projects associated with chapter 287, Laws of 2018.(2) Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only by the department to reimburse registered tow truck operators and licensed dismantlers for up to 100 percent of the total reasonable and auditable administrative costs for transport, dismantling, and disposal of abandoned recreational vehicles under RCW 46.53.010 when the last registered owner is unknown after a reasonable search effort. Compliance with RCW 46.55.100 is considered a reasonable effort to locate the last registered owner of the abandoned recreational vehicle. Any funds received by the registered tow truck operators or licensed dismantlers through collection efforts from the last owner of record shall be turned over to the department for vehicles reimbursed under RCW 46.53.010.(3) Funds in the account resulting from transfers from the general fund must be used to reimburse 100 percent of eligible costs up to a limit of $10,000 per vehicle for which cost reimbursements are requested.(4) ((In each fiscal biennium, beginning in the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and through December 31, 2025, up))Up to 15 percent of the expenditures from the account may be used for administrative expenses of the department in implementing this chapter. ((Beginning January 1, 2026, up to 10 percent of the expenditures from the account may be used for administrative expenses of the department in implementing this chapter.))NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. Effective July 1, 2026, the moneys in the salary/insurance contribution increase revolving fund established outside the state treasury and held by the office of financial management must be deposited into the general fund. On and after July 1, 2026, all revenues and receipts of the salary/insurance contribution increase revolving fund must be deposited into the general fund. Beginning July 1, 2026, the office of financial management may not make expenditures or transfers from the salary/insurance contribution increase revolving fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. Any residual balance of funds remaining in any account abolished in this act on July 1, 2026, shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the state general fund.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) Sections 1, 3, and 4 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.(2) Section 2 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---